District of Columbia statutes.
39-308

Tax status.

The Museum may engage in such activities that make it eligible for treatment as an organization described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.) which may be exempt from federal taxation under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.).

July 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-79, § 9, 27 DCR 2546
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 37, 36 DCR 492
1981 Ed., § 31-2108.